trunk/apertium-eu-en/apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
    <pardef n="glad/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="broad/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either adding -er and -est or with more and the most (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drab/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ber</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>best</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="flat/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fun/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either doubling the final consonant and adding -er and -est or directly adding -er and -est respectively">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ner</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="glum/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="up/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -p and add -per and -pest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>per</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mine__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maybe__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="very__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="where__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="that__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="the__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__det">
      <e c="aquí caldrà afegir-hi la marca de postgeneració">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="another__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="other__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="several__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="her__det">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/is__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ese</l>
          <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/at__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e r="RL" lm="a"><p><l><a/>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="a__det"/>    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="any"><i>any</i><par n="other__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="both"><i>both</i><par n="several__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="each"><i>each</i><par n="another__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="either"><i>either</i><par n="another__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="every"><i>every</i><par n="another__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="his"><i>his</i><par n="her__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="its"><i>its</i><par n="her__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="my"><i>my</i><par n="her__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="other__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="other"><i>other</i><par n="other__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="our"><i>our</i><par n="her__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="several"><i>several</i><par n="several__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="this"><i>th</i><par n="th/is__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="that"><i>th</i><par n="th/at__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="the__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="the same"><i>the<b/>same</i><par n="other__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="various"><i>various</i><par n="several__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="whatever"><i>whatever</i><par n="another__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="your"><i>your</i><par n="her__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="such a"><i>such a</i><par n="another__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="such"><i>such</i><par n="other__det"/>    </e>
    <e lm="broad"><i>broad</i><par n="broad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="flat"><i>flat</i><par n="flat/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fun"><i>fun</i><par n="fun/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="glad"><i>glad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hers"><i>hers</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="his"><i>his</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mad"><i>mad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mine"><i>mine</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ours"><i>ours</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="red"><i>red</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sad"><i>sad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="theirs"><i>theirs</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="yours"><i>yours</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="how"><i>how</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="more"><i>more</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pretty"><i>pretty</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="really"><i>really</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="too"><i>too</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="throwing stones"><i>throwing<b/>stones</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="beyond"><i>beyond</i><par n="maybe__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="how"><i>how</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="in the morning"><i>in<b/>the<b/>morning</i><par n="maybe__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="right"><i>right</i><par n="maybe__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="when"><i>when</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="by when"><i>by<b/>when</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="where"><i>where</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="from where"><i>from<b/>where</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="why"><i>why</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="and/or"><i>and/or</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="both"><i>both</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="but rather"><i>but<b/>rather</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="neither"><i>neither</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="or"><i>or</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="as well as"><i>as<b/>well<b/>as</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="if"><i>if</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e r="RL" lm="since" c="per ara RL perquè tagger s'equivoca molt amb 'pr'. (since the death of.. : des de la mort de (prep). Potser amb transfer es pot arreglar?"><i>since</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="that is"><i>that<b/>is</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="whereas" a="doriua"><i>whereas</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="that"><i>that</i><par n="that__cnjsub"/>    </e>
    <e lm="another"><i>another</i><par n="another__det"/>     </e>
    <e lm="any"><i>any</i><par n="very__preadv"/>     </e>
    <e lm="any"><i>any</i><par n="other__det"/>     </e>
    <e lm="cagily"><i>cagily</i><par n="maybe__adv"/>     </e>
    <e lm="either"><i>either</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>     </e>
    <e lm="as if"><i>as<b/>if</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="next Saturday"><i>next<b/>Saturday</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
